West Virginia, session 2025, HB2916.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 21. Personal Income Tax. PART VI. Procedure and Administration §11-21-98. Prohibition against  tax preparation software companies charging a fee for electronically filing State tax returns. (a) Tax preparation software companies are prohibited from charging taxpayers a fee to electronically file their West Virginia State tax returns. (b) As used in this section:(1) "Tax preparation software company" means a developer or vendor of any computer software program intended for tax return preparation purposes, including an off-the-shelf software program loaded onto a taxpayer's computer or an online tax preparation application.(2) "Taxpayer" means any person owing or liable to pay any State tax or any person deemed by the director to be so owing or liable.(3) "Electronic filing" means filing a tax document using computer technology, including transmission through the internet.(4) "Tax return" means a tax document which the director has authorized to be filed electronically.